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DTC 42 Both Fuel Pump Simultaneous Operation
Malfunction (*)

*: Fuel Tank Changeover Switch ON

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−108.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Item Trouble Area

42

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch ON

(Voltage of FPMS terminal is high)
(b) Voltage of FPM1 terminal is high
(c) Voltage of FPM2 terminal is high

SShort inmain fuelpumpcircuit (+Bshort)
SOpenorshort in fuel tankselect relaycircuit
SFuel tankselect relay
SShort insub fuel tank forcingdriving relaycircuit
SSub fuel tank forcingdriving relay
SShort insub fuelpumpcircuit (+Bshort)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−108.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 CheckvoltagebetweenterminalFPM 1 ofengineECUconnectorandbody
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(c) Push the fuel tank changeover switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal FPM1 of engine ECU and
body ground, turn the ignition switch ON after 4 seconds or
more.
OK:

Voltage:0 − 3.0V

OK Go to step 4.

NG
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2 Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI−49).

NG Replace fuel tank select relay, and then go to
step 4.

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank change-
over switch and fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and body ground
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness and connector, and
then go to step 4.

OK

4 Check for short in harness and connector between fuel tank select relay and
engine ECU, fuel tank select relay and main fuel pump (+B short circuit)
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

5 Check sub fuel tank forcing driving relay (See page FI−52).

NGReplace subfuel tankforcingdrivingrelay.

OK
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6 Check voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch to START.
(c) Push the fuel tank changeover switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU con-
nector and body ground, 4 seconds or more after starting the
engine.
OK:

Voltage: 9 − 14 V

NG Go to step 7.

OK

Check and repair harness and connector between sub fuel pump and sub fuel tank forcing
driving relay (+B short circuit) (See page IN−1 9) .

7 Check for short in harness and connector between sub fuel tank forcing driving
relay and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


